Arkansas, session 2025, SB122.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 17-7-106 is amended to read as follows:
17-7-106. Exemptions.
(a) This chapter does not apply to licensure or certification of:
(1) Medical Except as provided in subsection (c) of this
section, medical professions under Title 17, Subtitle 3;
(2) Legal professionals; or
(3) Individuals under reciprocity agreements.
(b) This chapter does not apply to an existing multistate or
interstate compact if the chapter would result in a nullification of the
multistate or interstate compact.
(c) This chapter applies to physicians licensed under the Arkansas
Medical Practices Act, § 17-95-201 et seq., § 17-95-301 et seq., and § 17-95-
401 et seq.
*JMB271*
04-07-2025 14:29:49 JMB271

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 SB122

/s/C. Penzo


































04-07-2025 14:29:49 JMB271